Utah statutes.
67-5-3.   Performance of legal services for agencies -- Billing -- "Agency" defined.

The attorney general may assign his legal assistants to perform legal services for any agency of state government.  He shall bill that agency for the legal services performed, if (1) the agency so billed receives federal funds to pay for the legal services rendered, or if (2) the agency collects funds from any other source in the form of fees, costs, interest, fines, penalties, forfeitures, or other proceeds reserved or designated for the payment of legal fees sufficient to pay for all or a portion of the legal services rendered; however, the agency may deduct any unreimbursed costs and expenses incurred by the agency in connection with the legal services rendered. As used in this act "agency" means any department, division, agency, commission, board, council, committee, authority, institution, or other entity within the state government of Utah.

